Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.625

Entity name not distinguishable from name of governmental entity.

(1) Any county, city, town, district, or other political subdivision of the state, or the state of Washington or any department or agency of the state, may apply to the secretary of state for the administrative dissolution, or the termination of registration, of any entity using a name that is not distinguishable from the name of the applicant for dissolution. The application must state the precise legal name of the governmental entity and its date of formation and the applicant shall mail a copy to the entity's registered agent. If the name of the entity is not distinguishable from the name of the applicant, then, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the secretary of state shall commence proceedings for administrative dissolution under RCW 23.95.610 or termination of registration under RCW 23.95.550.

(2) A name may not be considered distinguishable by virtue of the items specified in RCW 23.95.300(3).

(3)(a) The following are not distinguishable for purposes of this section:

(i) "City of Anytown" and "City of Anytown, Inc."; and

(ii) "City of Anytown" and "Anytown City."

(b) The following are distinguishable for purposes of this section:

(i) "City of Anytown" and "Anytown, Inc.";

(ii) "City of Anytown" and "The Anytown Company"; and

(iii) "City of Anytown" and "Anytown Cafe, Inc."

(4) If the entity that is the subject of the application was formed or registered before the formation of the applicant as a governmental entity, then this section applies only if the applicant for dissolution provides a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction determining that the applicant holds a superior property right to the name than does the entity.

(5) The duties of the secretary of state under this section are ministerial.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1606.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.